Utah statutes.
11-36a-603.   Refunds.

A local political subdivision shall refund any impact fee paid by a developer, plus interest earned, when:

(1)  the developer does not proceed with the development activity and has filed a written request for a refund;

(2)  the fee has not been spent or encumbered; and

(3)  no impact has resulted.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

